District of Columbia statutes.
1-161

Capitalsaurus dinosaur.

(a)

The Capitalsaurus dinosaur was discovered in January 1898, at First and F Streets, S.E., in the District of Columbia by workmen during a sewer connection project, and is the only known specimen of its kind in the world.

(b)

The Capitalsaurus was a large meat eating reptile which may be an ancestor of the T. (tyrannosaurus) rex.

(c)

About 110 million years ago, the Capitalsaurus lived in the District of Columbia with many other dinosaurs including herbivores.

(d)

During the lifetime of the Capitalsaurus, the District of Columbia resembled the bayou country of southern Louisiana.

(e)

The Capitalsaurus fossil discovered in 1898 is now at the Smithsonian Museum of Natural History in the type room.

(f)

The Capitalsaurus is unique to the District of Columbia because its fossil remains have not been discovered anywhere else in the world.

(g)

The vertebra of the dinosaur was given to the Smithsonian Institution as a gift by J.K. Murphy on January 28, 1898, and was recorded as accession number 33153 and specimen number NMNH 3049.

(h)

District of Columbia Public School students have been studying the Capitalsaurus and many other dinosaurs from this area for years.

(i)

The students have also helped to dig up dinosaurs fossils which are now part of the Smithsonian’s permanent collection.

(j)

The Capitalsaurus shall be the official Dinosaur of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-155, § 2, 45 DCR 4476
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 2, 46 DCR 2118
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-41, § 4, 46 DCR 6552
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 102, 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-131.
D.C. Law 13-41, in subsec. (g), substituted “specimen NMNH 3049” for “specimen NMNH 3409”.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (g), inserted “number” preceding “NMNH”.